Illinois, session 104th, HB3162.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 6the Department of Human Services to establish the Illinois 7Reentry Housing Institute to provide cohort-based training and 8technical assistance to reentry organizations interested in 9housing development and technical assistance to traditional 10developers who wish to create effective reentry housing. 11    Section 10. The sum of $48,000,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 13Fund to the Illinois Housing Development Authority to expand 14the Housing for Justice-Involved Individuals Program. 15    Section 15. The sum of $28,800,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 17Fund to the Illinois Housing Development Authority to continue 18the Re-Entry Special Demonstration Program. 19    Section 20. The sum of $18,200,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 21Fund to the Department of Human Services to create the Home for   HB3162- 2 -LRB104 10365 KTG 20440 b1Good Program for case management, housing navigation, and 2wraparound support services for people with criminal records. 3    Section 25. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 5Fund to the Department of Human Services for interagency 6coordination with the Illinois Housing Development Authority 7to coordinate the Illinois Reentry Housing Institute, the 8Housing for Justice-Involved Individuals Program, the Re-Entry 9Special Demonstration Program, and the Home for Good Program. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112025.